Utah statutes.
48-3a-1103.   Additional requirements for certificate of organization.

The certificate of organization of a professional services company shall:

(1)  comply with Section 48-3a-201; and

(2)  contain the following:

(a)  a name consistent with Section 48-3a-1104;

(b)  a description of the profession to be practiced through the professional services company; and

(c)  notwithstanding Section 48-3a-201, the name and street address of each member or manager of the professional services company.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

